Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.710

Homeless youth—Office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs—Report to the director—Grants—Program management and oversight.

(1)(a) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall report to the director or the director's designee.

(b)(i) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs may distribute grants to providers who serve homeless youth and young adults throughout the state.

(ii) The grants must fund services in the five key components in RCW 43.330.700.

(iii) The grants must be expended on a statewide basis and may be used to support direct services, as well as technical assistance, evaluation, and capacity building.

(2) The office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall provide management and oversight guidance and direction to the following programs:

(a) HOPE centers as described in RCW 43.185C.315;

(b) Crisis residential centers as described in RCW 43.185C.295;

(c) Street outreach services as defined in RCW 43.185C.010;

(d) Independent youth housing programs as described in RCW 43.63A.305.

[ 2019 c 124 s 6; 2015 c 69 s 7.]